Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.46, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Coverage for preventive items and services. (a) "Preventive items and services" has the meaning specified in the Affordable Care Act. Preventive items and services includes: (1) evidence-based items or services that have in effect a rating of A or B in the current recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force with respect to the individual involved; (2) immunizations for routine use in children, adolescents, and adults that have in effectnew text begin with respect to the individual involvednew text end a recommendation fromnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i) new text end the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with respect to the individual involved. For purposes of this deleted text begin clausedeleted text end new text begin itemnew text end , a recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention is considered in effect after the recommendation has been adopted by the Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and a recommendation is considered to be for routine use if the recommendation is listed on the Immunization Schedules of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; new text begin (ii) the American Academy of Pediatrics. For purposes of this item, a recommendation from the American Academy of Pediatrics is considered in effect and for routine use if the recommendation is listed on the American Academy of Pediatrics' Recommended Child and Adolescent Immunization Schedule; or new text end new text begin (iii) the West Coast Health Alliance; new text end (3) with respect to infants, children, and adolescents, evidence-informed preventive care and screenings provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health Resources and Services Administration; (4) with respect to women, additional preventive care and screenings that are not listed with a rating of A or B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force but that are provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health Resources and Services Administration; (5) all contraceptive methods established in guidelines published by the United States Food and Drug Administration; (6) screenings for human immunodeficiency virus for: (i) all individuals at least 15 years of age but less than 65 years of age; and (ii) all other individuals with increased risk of human immunodeficiency virus infection according to guidance from the Centers for Disease Control; (7) all preexposure prophylaxis when used for the prevention or treatment of human immunodeficiency virus, including but not limited to all preexposure prophylaxis, as defined in any guidance by the United States Preventive Services Task Force or the Centers for Disease Control, including the June 11, 2019, Preexposure Prophylaxis for the Prevention of HIV Infection United States Preventive Services Task Force Recommendation Statement; and (8) all postexposure prophylaxis when used for the prevention or treatment of human immunodeficiency virus, including but not limited to all postexposure prophylaxis as defined in any guidance by the United States Preventive Services Task Force or the Centers for Disease Control. (b) A health plan company must provide coverage for preventive items and services at a participating provider without imposing cost-sharing requirements, including a deductible, coinsurance, or co-payment. Nothing in this section prohibits a health plan company that has a network of providers from excluding coverage or imposing cost-sharing requirements for preventive items or services that are delivered by an out-of-network provider. (c) A health plan company is not required to provide coverage for any items or services specified in any recommendation or guideline described in paragraph (a) if the recommendation or guideline is no longer included as a preventive item or service as defined in paragraph (a). Annually, a health plan company must determine whether any additional items or services must be covered without cost-sharing requirements or whether any items or services are no longer required to be covered. (d) Nothing in this section prevents a health plan company from using reasonable medical management techniques to determine the frequency, method, treatment, or setting for a preventive item or service to the extent not specified in the recommendation or guideline. (e) A health plan shall not require prior authorization or step therapy for preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis, except that: if the United States Food and Drug Administration has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, device, or product for the prevention of HIV, this paragraph does not require a health plan to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization or step therapy, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization or step therapy. (f) This section does not apply to grandfathered plans. (g) This section does not apply to plans offered by the Minnesota Comprehensive Health Association. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, for health plans offered, issued, sold, or renewed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [145.675] MINNESOTA SCIENCE-BASED VACCINE ADVISORY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must establish the Minnesota Science-Based Vaccine Advisory Council to help ensure the public has access to credible, science-based information for confidence in vaccine safety and efficacy through a transparent, deliberative process. The advisory council is established to: new text end new text begin (1) develop and publish recommended schedules of vaccines for adults, infants, children, and adolescents; new text end new text begin (2) recommend updates, if any, to the vaccines required for enrollment in elementary or secondary schools or child care facilities; and new text end new text begin (3) recommend updates, if any, to the vaccines required for enrollment in postsecondary institutions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory council must consist of at least 16 members who are trusted scientists, clinicians, and public health leaders with knowledge of and backgrounds in vaccines and immunization, including: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of health or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) one physician licensed and practicing in the state, appointed by the Minnesota Medical Association; new text end new text begin (3) one physician licensed and practicing in the state in the area of internal medicine, appointed by the American College of Physicians, Minnesota Chapter; new text end new text begin (4) one physician licensed and practicing in the state in the area of pediatrics, appointed by the American Academy of Pediatrics, Minnesota Chapter; new text end new text begin (5) one physician licensed and practicing in the state in the area of family medicine, appointed by the Minnesota Academy of Family Physicians; new text end new text begin (6) one physician licensed and practicing in the state in the area of obstetrics and gynecology, appointed by the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, Minnesota Section; new text end new text begin (7) one registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed and practicing in the state, appointed by the Minnesota Nurses Association; new text end new text begin (8) one pediatric nurse practitioner licensed and practicing in the state, appointed by the National Association of Pediatric Nurse Practitioners, Minnesota Chapter; new text end new text begin (9) one licensed school nurse practicing in the state in a public elementary or secondary school, appointed by the School Nurse Organization of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (10) one health care provider employed by a postsecondary institution; new text end new text begin (11) one pharmacist licensed and practicing in the state with experience providing immunization services to patients, appointed by the Minnesota Pharmacists Association; new text end new text begin (12) one member of a Minnesota community health board; new text end new text begin (13) one member of a Tribal Nation health department; new text end new text begin (14) one representative specializing in infectious disease research, appointed by the Infectious Disease Society of America; new text end new text begin (15) one representative appointed by the Minnesota Council of Health Plans; new text end new text begin (16) one representative from the Center for Infectious Disease Research and Policy at the University of Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (17) representatives with other areas of expertise as identified by the advisory council. new text end new text begin (b) Each appointing authority must make appointments by September 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) An appointing authority may designate an alternate member to attend and participate in advisory council meetings in the appointed member's place, including replacing an appointed member at the appointing authority's discretion. An appointing authority may replace any member who steps down from the advisory committee or who, in the judgment of the appointing authority, fails to attend a sufficient number of advisory council meetings. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Organization and meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health must chair the first meeting of the advisory council. At the first meeting, the advisory council must select a chair from the advisory council's membership. The advisory council must meet at least four times per year, and more frequently at the call of the chair or at the request of a majority of advisory council members. Meetings must be open to the public. The advisory council must provide opportunities for public input at meetings, including oral public testimony. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the advisory council receive no compensation for their service but shall be reimbursed as provided in section 15.059 for expenses incurred as a result of their duties as members of the advisory council. new text end new text begin (c) Advisory council meetings are subject to the Open Meeting Law under chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties and powers. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory council must: new text end new text begin (1) develop and publish recommended schedules of vaccines in the state for adults, infants, children, and adolescents on an annual basis; new text end new text begin (2) recommend to the commissioner modifications, if any, to the specific immunizations required for enrollment in elementary or secondary schools or child care facilities under section 121A.15 and Minnesota Rules, chapter 4604; and new text end new text begin (3) recommend to the commissioner modifications, if any, to the specific immunizations required for enrollment in postsecondary institutions under section 135A.14 and Minnesota Rules, chapter 4604. new text end new text begin (b) In developing science-based vaccine and immunization recommendations, the advisory council must consider current peer-reviewed scientific studies and sound public health policy. new text end new text begin (c) If the advisory council chair determines that the commissioner does not adequately consider the advisory council's recommendations when considering updates to the required immunization schedules, the chair may call for an override vote. If two-thirds of the advisory council vote to override the existing state vaccine schedules, the advisory council may republish the advisory council's own recommendations to serve as the state vaccine schedules. The advisory council's recommendations must serve as the state vaccine schedules for no less than six months. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide meeting space and administrative services for the advisory council. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA SCIENCE-BASED VACCINE ADVISORY COUNCIL.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the Minnesota Science-Based Vaccine Advisory Council under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.675. new text end new text begin (b) The general fund base for this appropriation is $....... in fiscal year 2028 and $....... in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end